Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 658.705 to
658.850.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “landowner” means any  person that has a sub-
stantial ownership interest in real property.
(2) A landowner who, at the time of the farmworker camp’s operation,  knows or should
have known that the  landowner’s property is being used as the site of a farmworker camp
shall be jointly and severally liable with the person acting as  the farmworker camp operator
to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in ORS 658.805 (3) and (4).
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a landowner  did not know and could not rea-
sonably have known of the operation of an unregistered  farmworker camp on the
landowner’s property if the landowner produces a written lease agreement  or a copy thereof
that expressly prohibits the operation of an unregistered farmworker camp  on the property
by the lessee or any other person. The presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance
of the evidence that the landowner knew or should have known  of the operation of the
farmworker camp.
SECTION 3.  ORS 658.805 is amended to read:
658.805. (1) Except to appeal from an act or determination  of the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries or the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, no person operating
a farmworker camp, as defined in ORS 658.705, is entitled  to demand, receive or accept any fee di-
rectly or indirectly or maintain any suit or action in the courts  of this state involving the
farmworker camp, without alleging and proving that the person was registered or indorsed to oper-
ate a farmworker camp.
(2) The commissioner, Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services or any
local governmental agency may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to  enjoin any per-
son from violating any of the provisions of ORS 658.705 to 658.850, or rules  adopted pursuant
thereto, and from committing future violations.
(3) Any aggrieved person may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction [ to enjoin ]
against any person violating ORS 658.715 (1) or 658.755 (2)(a) [ from violating ] who violates  any of
the provisions of ORS 658.705  to 658.850, or rules adopted pursuant thereto,  to recover damages
and to enjoin the person  [ and] from committing future violations.
Enrolled House Bill 3194 (HB 3194-A) Page 1
(4) In actions brought pursuant to  this section, the court may award to the prevailing party
costs and disbursements and a reasonable attorney fee. In addition,  if damages are found, the
amount of damages recoverable from a farmworker camp operator  who is subject to suit pursuant
to subsection (3) of  this section who violates ORS 658.705 to 658.850 is actual damages or [ $500]
$2,000, whichever is greater.
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3194 (HB 3194-A) Page 2